New York, session 2025-2026, S6458.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 382 of the executive law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 5 to read as follows: 3 5. a. A lawful occupant of a dwelling unit or a group of such occu- 4 pants in a building may bring an action alleging a violation of the 5 uniform code for failure to keep and maintain self-closing doors in any 6 court of competent jurisdiction. If such court finds that an owner of 7 such building is in violation of such uniform code, such court shall, in 8 addition to any other relief such court determines to be appropriate: 9 i. award to each such occupant (A) compensatory damages and, in such 10 court's discretion, punitive damages or (B) at the election of each 11 occupant, damages of one thousand dollars; 12 ii. award to such occupants reasonable attorneys' fees and court 13 costs; and 14 iii. issue an order to such owner to remedy the conditions related to 15 such self-closing doors. 16 b. Such occupant or occupants shall not be relieved of the obligation 17 to pay rent for which such occupant or occupants are otherwise liable to 18 an owner. Any monetary relief awarded to such occupant or occupants 19 pursuant to paragraph a of this subdivision shall be reduced by any 20 amount of delinquent rent or other sum for which such court finds such 21 occupant or occupants to be liable to such owner. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02592-01-5 S. 6458 2 1 c. This subdivision does not limit or abrogate any claim or cause of 2 action a person has under common law or by other law or rule. The 3 provisions of this subdivision are in addition to any other remedies 4 that may be provided for under common law or by other law or rule. 5 d. Nothing contained in this subdivision shall be construed as creat- 6 ing any private right of action against a local government or any agency 7 or employee thereof. 8 § 2. The administrative code of the city of New York is amended by 9 adding a new section 27-2114-a to read as follows: 10 § 27-2114-a Private right of action. a. A lawful occupant of a dwell- 11 ing unit or a group of such occupants in a building may bring an action 12 alleging a violation of this code for failure to keep and maintain self- 13 closing doors in any court of competent jurisdiction. If such court 14 finds that an owner of such building is in violation of such code, such 15 court shall, in addition to any other relief such court determines to be 16 appropriate: 17 1. award to each such occupant (i) compensatory damages and, in such 18 court's discretion, punitive damages or (ii) at the election of each 19 occupant, damages of one thousand dollars; 20 2. award to such occupants reasonable attorneys' fees and court costs; 21 and 22 3. issue an order to such owner to remedy the conditions related to 23 such self-closing doors. 24 b. Such occupant or occupants shall not be relieved of the obligation 25 to pay rent for which such occupant or occupants are otherwise liable to 26 an owner. Any monetary relief awarded to such occupant or occupants 27 pursuant to subdivision a of this section shall be reduced by any amount 28 of delinquent rent or other sum for which such court finds such occupant 29 or occupants to be liable to such owner. 30 c. This section does not limit or abrogate any claim or cause of 31 action a person has under common law or by other law or rule. The 32 provisions of this section are in addition to any other remedies that 33 may be provided for under common law or by other law or rule. 34 d. Nothing contained in this section shall be construed as creating 35 any private right of action against the city or any agency or employee 36 thereof. 37 § 3. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 38 have become a law.